Kentucky statutes. TITLE XIV Libraries And Archives
CHAPTER 173 City, County, and Regional Libraries

173.005.
Compliance with KRS 65A.010 to 65A.090.

Any board of trustees formed and operating under KRS

173.010

to

173.410

shall comply with the provisions of KRS

65A.010

to

65A.090

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 40, § 59, effective March 21, 2013.